Illinois, session 104th, HB4389.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Starter Home Incentive Zone Act. 6    Section 3. Legislative purpose. The purpose of this Act is 7to expand homeownership opportunities for Illinois families by 8encouraging municipalities to voluntarily adopt zoning reforms 9allowing construction of entry-level, detached single-family 10homes. Participation in this program is strictly voluntary, 11must preserve full local zoning authority, and must not 12authorize or require any municipality to allow multifamily 13housing. This Act promotes freedom, local control, and 14market-driven development without mandates. 15    Section 5. Applicability.16    (a) This Act applies only to detached single-family homes.17    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize, 18require, encourage, or permit any municipality to approve:19        (1) multifamily housing;20        (2) duplexes, triplexes, or fourplexes;21        (3) townhomes or rowhomes;22        (4) condominiums or cooperative housing; or  HB4389- 2 -LRB104 16675 RTM 30079 b1        (5) any residential structure containing more than one 2    dwelling unit. 3    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:4    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity.6    "Designated zone" means the geographic area within a 7municipality where qualifying reforms apply.8    "Qualifying reforms" means the reforms described in 9Section 15.10    "Starter home" means a detached, single-family residence 11containing no more than 1,600 square feet of heated living 12space.13    "Starter Home Incentive Zone" or "SHIZ" means an area 14certified by the Department under this Act.15    "SHIZ-certified municipality" means a municipality 16containing at least one SHIZ certified by the Department. 17    Section 15. Qualifying reforms.18    (a) A municipality may establish a Starter Home Incentive 19Zone within a designated area if the municipality adopts any 3 20of the following reforms within a designated zone:21        (1) reduced minimum lot sizes applicable to detached 22    single-family homes;23        (2) reduced minimum dwelling size requirements 24    permitting homes of 1,600 square feet or less;  HB4389- 3 -LRB104 16675 RTM 30079 b1        (3) fast-track permitting with a decision issued 2    within 10 to 20 business days;3        (4) reduction, waiver, or cap of impact fees for 4    detached single-family homes; or5        (5) reduced setback requirements.6    (b) A municipality may, but is not required to, adopt more 7than 3 of the reforms listed in subsection (a). 8    Section 20. Incentives for municipalities.9    (a) A SHIZ-certified municipality shall receive the 10following priority access benefits from the Department:11        (1) The Department shall review grant applications 12    submitted by SHIZ-certified municipalities before 13    reviewing applications submitted by other municipalities. 14        (2) SHIZ-certified municipalities shall receive not 15    less than a 10% scoring preference during competitive 16    grant evaluations administered by the Department. 17        (3) If there is a scoring tie between applicants 18    during competitive grant evaluations administered by the 19    Department, then a SHIZ-certified municipality shall be 20    awarded the higher ranking.21    (b) The priority access provisions in subsection (a) apply 22to the following programs administered by the Department of 23Commerce and Economic Opportunity, including successor or 24substantially similar programs:25        (1) the Local Public Infrastructure Grants Program;  HB4389- 4 -LRB104 16675 RTM 30079 b1        (2) any Community Development Block Grant local 2    improvement programs;3        (3) the Rebuild Illinois Economic Development Program;4        (4) the Broadband Expansion Grant Program;5        (5) the Water and Sewer Infrastructure Grants Program;6        (6) any Public Infrastructure and Capital Development 7    Programs; and8        (7) any successor program that provides grants for 9    local infrastructure, economic development, community 10    improvement, water, sewer, broadband, or capital 11    improvements.12    (c) SHIZ-certified municipalities shall receive a 25% 13reduction in required local match contributions for programs 14listed in subsection (b), where consistent with the 15authorizing statutes and federal program requirements.16    (d) The Department shall provide SHIZ-certified 17municipalities with a State-issued program emblem and shall 18include all certified municipalities on the Department's 19publicly available statewide list of Starter Home Incentive 20Zones.21    (e) The Illinois Department of Transportation may give 22favorable consideration to SHIZ-certified municipalities when 23evaluating applications for:24        (1) local highway safety improvement grants;25        (2) local capacity improvement or congestion 26    mitigation projects;  HB4389- 5 -LRB104 16675 RTM 30079 b1        (3) traffic signal modernization or roadway 2    enhancement grants; and3        (4) any successor local transportation improvement 4    program.5    This subsection does not impose a mandate on the 6Department of Transportation. 7    Section 25. Certification process.8    (a) A municipality seeking to establish a Starter Home 9Incentive Zone shall:10        (1) adopt a municipal ordinance establishing a 11    designated zone;12        (2) identify which qualifying reforms under Section 15 13    have been implemented within the designated zone; and14        (3) submit a compliance statement and a map of the 15    designated zone to the Department in a form prescribed by 16    the Department.17    (b) Upon determining that the municipality has satisfied 18the requirements of subsection (a), the Department shall issue 19written certification and include the SHIZ on the statewide 20list of Starter Home Incentive Zones. 21    Section 30. Annual reporting.22    (a) On or before January 31 of each year, a SHIZ-certified 23municipality shall submit a report, not to exceed 2 pages, for 24each Starter Home Incentive Zone within the municipality. The   HB4389- 6 -LRB104 16675 RTM 30079 b1report shall:2        (1) confirm that the qualifying reforms the 3    municipality adopted to establish the Starter Home 4    Incentive Zone remain active and in effect;5        (2) confirm that the qualifying reforms the 6    municipality adopted to establish the Starter Home 7    Incentive Zone are enforced within the designated zone; 8    and9        (3) inform the Department of any updates to the 10    boundaries of the designated zone.11    (b) Failure to submit the annual report may result in 12suspension of program benefits until the municipality returns 13to compliance. 14    Section 35. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 15necessary to implement this Act in accordance with the 16Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 17    Section 40. State zoning limitation. Nothing in this Act 18shall be construed to authorize the State, the Department, or 19any other State agency to impose zoning requirements, land-use 20mandates, density requirements, or zoning modifications on any 21municipality. All zoning authority remains fully and 22exclusively local. 23    Section 45. Limitation on reporting requirements. The   HB4389- 7 -LRB104 16675 RTM 30079 b1Department may not require any municipality to submit reports, 2data, analyses, or documentation beyond the annual compliance 3report described in Section 30, unless expressly authorized by 4this Act. 5    Section 50. Protection of builder freedom. Nothing in this 6Act shall be construed to require any builder, developer, 7contractor, or private party to construct a starter home or to 8participate in a Starter Home Incentive Zone. Participation in 9this program is voluntary for both municipalities and private 10parties. 11    Section 55. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 12starter homes in a manner inconsistent with the regulation by 13the State of starter homes under this Act. This Section is a 14limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 15the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 16rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.